Illinois, session 104th, SB1541.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)7    Sec. 2HHHH. Receipts; disclose single unit price. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "retail seller" means a 9person regularly engaged in, and whose business consists to a 10substantial extent of, selling, and who in the ordinary course 11of business regularly sells or offers to sell goods to 12consumers. 13    (b) Any printed or digital receipt issued or made 14available to a consumer by a retail seller at the time of sale 15must clearly list the single unit price of each individual 16item purchased by the consumer regardless of the number or 17quantity of each individual item purchased by the consumer at 18the time of sale.19    (c) A retail seller who violates this Section commits an 20unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.